Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5456XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2004 Section 1. Section 423F.3, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Additionally, âschool infrastructureâ 3 includes the increased costs of insurance coverage for the 4 school district that is associated with employing an individual 5 who has been issued a professional permit to carry weapons 6 under section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 7 (3). 8